Hawaii statutes.
§480-15.1 Penalty. Any person, firm,
company, association, or corporation violating an injunctive order to cease and
desist from violating any provisions of this chapter shall be fined by a sum
not less than $500 nor more than $10,000, which sum shall be collected in a
civil action brought by the attorney general or the director of the office of
consumer protection on behalf of the State. Each separate violation of any
such order shall be a separate offense, except that in the case of a violation
through continuing failure or neglect to obey a final order of the court, each
day of continuance of such failure shall constitute a separate offense. [L
1968, c 10, §3; am L 1975, c 93, §1; am L 1976, c 33, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next